Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-100 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Department of Education shall establish, or
contract with a private company to establish, an online transparency
portal. The portal shall be an online tool to support parental
rights to access, review, and comment upon curriculum, instructional
materials, textbooks, and library materials being used by the school
district where their child attends school, and which their child
might be exposed to without prior parental knowledge or consent.
Req. No. 10166 Page 1

B. The online transparency portal shall include, at a minimum:
1. A simple, universally accessible website that allows the
user to search for, display, review, and comment on materials
available to the user's child at the school district. Materials
include but are not limited to:
a. textbooks,
b. library books,
c. co-curricular content and materials, especially any
social and emotional learning or character-based
curricula, and
d. content from third-party learning applications;
2. Easy-to-use administrative interfaces for school district
employees to upload content and for Department employees to oversee
and have access to content;
3. User-friendly alignment crosswalks of textbook and
instructional content to state academic standards and other
frameworks as needed for improved searching;
4. Alignment of library content to Lexile or other generally
accepted and reputable reading levels;
5. International Standard Book Number (ISBN) integration of
library materials for a robust display of library material content
for parental review;
6. Content searchable by school district or publisher-supplied
scope and sequence information; and
Req. No. 10166 Page 2

7. Public and private comment by users. All comments shall be
moderated by the Department, and the Department shall coordinate
publishing of comments and sharing feedback with school districts
when appropriate. User authentication shall be required and comments
may be cataloged and stored for compliance and auditing purposes.
C. Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, and in each
subsequent school year, school districts shall participate in the
online transparency portal created in subsection A of this section
and ensure all of the materials listed in subsection B of this
section are available on the portal for parental review.
D. The Department may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10166 AQH 11/18/24





Req. No. 10166 Page 3